Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2587.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Private Robert M. Pittman Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Robert M. Pittman was born June 19, 1921, in Green Township, Indiana County.(2) Robert attended Commodore High School, where he graduated on May 20, 1940.(3) Private Robert M. Pittman was awarded various honors throughout his service in the United States Army, including the World War II Victory Medal, Purple Heart, American Campaign Medal, Army Presidential Unit Citation and the Army Good Conduct Medal.123456789101112131415161718 (4) Private Robert M. Pittman was aboard the USS Dorchester when it was torpedoed near Greenland, and his remains were lost at sea.(5) The ship is the ship of the "Four Chaplains," who gave away their life jackets that others might live.(6) Private Robert M. Pittman's name is listed on the Tablets of the Missing of the East Coast Memorial, New York, NY.(7) Private Robert M. Pittman was reported missing in action and ultimately declared dead on February 3, 1943.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 19186, Pennsylvania Route 580, carrying Cush Cushion Creek in Green Township, Indiana County, is designated as the Private Robert M. Pittman Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2587PN3496 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819